North Dakota, session 69, HB1452.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-52.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Health insurance benefits coverage - Prescription drug coverage - Antiobesity
medication.
1. The prescription drug component of the health insurance benefits coverage must
include coverage of at least two antiobesity medications approved by the United
States food and drug administration with an indication for chronic weight management
in a patient with obesity.
2. The coverage criteria for antiobesity medication may not be more restrictive than the
United States food and drug administration approved indications.
3. The coverage provided under this section may be subject to cost-sharing
requirements, including a deductible, copayment, coinsurance, or annual or maximum
benefit provision, provided the requirements are consistent with requirements
applicable to other pharmaceutical coverage under the health insurance benefits
coverage.
4. The insurer shall provide notice to policyholders regarding the coverage required by
this section. The notice must be:
a. In writing;
b. Prominently positioned in any literature or correspondence; and
Page No. 1 25.0747.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
c. Provided to policyholders when annual information is made available, or in any
other mailing to policyholders.
SECTION 2. PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT SYSTEM - PRESCRIPTION DRUG
COVERAGE - ANTIOBESITY MEDICATION - REPORT TO LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY.
Pursuant to section 54-03-28, the public employees retirement system shall prepare and submit
for introduction a bill to the seventieth legislative assembly to repeal the expiration date for this
Act and to extend the coverage of prescription drug benefits for antiobesity medication to all
group and individual health insurance policies. The public employees retirement system shall
append a report to the bill regarding the effect of the prescription drug benefits for antiobesity
medication requirement on the system's health insurance programs, information on the
utilization and costs relating to the coverage, and a recommendation regarding whether the
coverage should be continued.
SECTION 3. APPLICATION. This Act applies to health benefits coverage that begins after
June 30, 2025, and which does not extend past June 30, 2027.
SECTION 4. EXPIRATION DATE. This Act is effective through June 30, 2027, and after that
date is ineffective.
Page No. 2 25.0747.01000